apertium-kmr.kmr.dix
    <pardef n="/baş__adj">
      <e><p><l>baş</l><r>baş<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>baştir</l><r>baş<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>tirîn</l><r>in<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>çêtir</l><r>baş<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>çêtirîn</l><r>baş<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="mez/in__adj">
      <e><p><l>in</l><r>in<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tir</l><r>in<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>tirîn</l><r>in<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>intir</l><r>in<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>intirîn</l><r>in<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- SECTION: Verbs -->


<!---	<pardef n="/bûn__lv">

        </pardef> -->
    

    <pardef n="k/e__vblex">
        <e><p><l>im</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>î</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<!--        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>     --> 
        <e><p><l>in</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>in</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>in</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef> 

    <pardef n="/bûn">
        <e><p><l>bûm</l><r><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>bûyî</l><r><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>bû</l><r><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>bû</l><r><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>bûye</l><r><s n="narr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>bûne</l><r><s n="narr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>bûna</l><r><s n="narr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>biwa</l><r><s n="narr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>bûn</l><r><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>bûn</l><r><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>bûn</l><r><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>dibûm</l><r><s n="prog"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>dibûyî</l><r><s n="prog"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>dibû</l><r><s n="prog"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>dibûn</l><r><s n="prog"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>dibûn</l><r><s n="prog"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>dibûn</l><r><s n="prog"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>dibim</l><r><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>dibî</l><r><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>dibe</l><r><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>be</l><r><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>bî</l><r><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- check later -->
        <e><p><l>dibin</l><r><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>dibin</l><r><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>dibin</l><r><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
	<e><p><l>bib</l><r><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="k/e__vblex"/></e>
	<e><p><l>bib</l><r><s n="fut"/></r></p><par n="k/e__vblex"/></e>
</pardef>

    <pardef n="/bûn__vbcop">
        <!-- Post-consonantal -->
        <e r="LR"><p><l>im</l><r>bûn<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>î</l><r>bûn<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l><r>bûn<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>in</l><r>bûn<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>in</l><r>bûn<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>in</l><r>bûn<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <!-- Post-vocalic -->
        <e r="LR"><p><l>me</l><r>bûn<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>yî</l><r>bûn<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>ye</l><r>bûn<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>ne</l><r>bûn<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>ne</l><r>bûn<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="LR"><p><l>ne</l><r>bûn<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>im</l><r>bûn<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>î</l><r>bûn<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>e</l><r>bûn<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>in</l><r>bûn<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>in</l><r>bûn<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e r="RL"><p><l><a/>in</l><r>bûn<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l></l><r>bûn<s n="vbcop"/></r></p><par n="/bûn"/></e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="/bûn__vblex">
        <e><p><l></l><r>bûn<s n="vblex"/><s n="iv"/></r></p><par n="/bûn"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="/bûn__vaux">
        <e><p><l></l><r>bûn<s n="vaux"/></r></p><par n="/bûn"/></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="d/an_vblex_tv">
        <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>aye</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="narr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>in</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>an</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l><b/>bû</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l><b/>bûn</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ned/an_vblex_tv">
        <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>ye</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="neg"/><s n="narr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l><b/>bû</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="neg"/><s n="plu"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>im</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>î</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>in</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>in</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
        <e><p><l>in</l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="tv"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="mezin"><i>mez</i><par n="mez/in__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="mezin" r="LR"><p><l>maz</l><r>mez</r></p><par n="mez/in__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="baş"><i/><par n="/baş__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="bûn"><i/><par n="/bûn__vbcop"/></e>
    <e lm="rabûn"><p><l>ra</l><r>ra</r></p><par n="/bûn__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="rabûn" r="LR"><p><l>ra<b/></l><r>ra</r></p><par n="/bûn__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="çêbûn"><p><l>çê</l><r>çê</r></p><par n="/bûn__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="çêbûn" r="LR"><p><l>çê<b/></l><r>çê</r></p><par n="/bûn__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ji dayîk bûn"><p><l>ji<b/>dayîk<b/></l><r>ji<b/>dayîk<b/></r></p><par n="/bûn__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="teqez bûn"><p><l>teqez<b/></l><r>teqez</r></p><par n="/bûn__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="teqezbûn" r="LR"><p><l>teqez</l><r>teqez</r></p><par n="/bûn__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="berdewam bûn"><p><l>berdewam<b/></l><r>berdewam<b/></r></p><par n="/bûn__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sekinî bûn"><p><l>sekinî<b/></l><r>sekinî<b/></r></p><par n="/bûn__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="hişyar bûn"><p><l>hişyar<b/></l><r>hişyar<b/></r></p><par n="/bûn__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="bûn"><i/><par n="/bûn__vaux"/></e>
    <e lm="dengdan"><p><l>dengd</l><r>dengdan</r></p><par n="d/an_vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="dengdan"><p><l>dengned</l><r>dengdan</r></p><par n="ned/an_vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="hewldan"><p><l>hewld</l><r>hewldan</r></p><par n="d/an_vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="hewldan"><p><l>hewlned</l><r>hewldan</r></p><par n="ned/an_vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="hewldan"><p><l>hewl<b/>d</l><r>hewldan</r></p><par n="d/an_vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="hewldan"><p><l>hewl<b/>ned</l><r>hewldan</r></p><par n="ned/an_vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="pêşandan"><p><l>pêşand</l><r>pêşandan</r></p><par n="d/an_vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="pêşandan"><p><l>pêşanned</l><r>pêşandan</r></p><par n="ned/an_vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="hewldan"><p><l>hewld</l><r>hewldan</r></p><par n="d/an_vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="hewldan"><p><l>hewlned</l><r>hewldan</r></p><par n="ned/an_vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="tevdan"><p><l>tevd</l><r>tevdan</r></p><par n="d/an_vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="tevdan"><p><l>tevned</l><r>tevdan</r></p><par n="ned/an_vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="hildan"><p><l>hild</l><r>hildan</r></p><par n="d/an_vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="hildan"><p><l>hilned</l><r>hildan</r></p><par n="ned/an_vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="hildan"><p><l>hilnad</l><r>hildan</r></p><par n="ned/an_vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="nîşandan"><p><l>nîşand</l><r>nîşandan</r></p><par n="d/an_vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="nîşandan"><p><l>nîşanned</l><r>nîşandan</r></p><par n="ned/an_vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="dan"><p><l>d</l><r>dan</r></p><par n="d/an_vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="dan"><p><l>ned</l><r>dan</r></p><par n="ned/an_vblex_tv"/></e>
    <e lm="berdan"><p><l>berd</l><r>berdan</r></p><par n="d/an_vblex_tv"/></e>
